New Jersey, session 222, A5287.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following language provision is added to section 1 of P.L.2025 c.74, the annual State appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2026. 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 75 State Subsidies and Financial Aid STATE AID Notwithstanding the provision of any law or regulation to the contrary, the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for City of Paterson  Recreation Center Capital Improvements (PTRF) by P.L.2024, c.22, the annual State appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2025, is reassigned to the New Jersey Community Development Corporation to support a youth center project in the City of Paterson, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.